California, session 20252026, AB2656.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3558.10 is added to the Government Code, to read:3558.10. (a) For purposes of this section, “generative artificial intelligence” and “artificial intelligence” have the same meanings as those terms are defined in Section 11549.64.(b) A public employer identified in subdivision (a) of Section 3555.5 shall provide a recognized employee organization no less than 45 days’ written notice before taking an action to develop, purchase, implement, or utilize or require the use of any generative artificial intelligence to perform a service that is within the scope of work of the job classification represented by the recognized employee organization.